Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6166.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that:(a) The terms and titles used by health care professionals in clinical settings play a critical role in ensuring transparency and trust between patients and their health care professionals. Misunderstandings about health care professionals' credentials can lead to patient confusion, erode trust, and impact the quality of care;(b) All members of the health care team play an important role in patient care, however, the use of the title "doctor" in clinical settings and public communications, without clear clarification, may inadvertently lead patients to believe that these health care professionals have attained a doctor of medicine or doctor of osteopathic medicine degree;(c) Many patients may not fully understand the distinctions between different health care credentials. Studies have shown that promoting clarity in the titles of health care professionals improves patient satisfaction and ensures that individuals are better informed about the qualifications of the professionals treating them and the level of care that can be appropriately provided;(d) Protecting patients from potential misrepresentation is critical to maintaining the integrity of the health care system. Transparency in health care professional titles and communications allows patients to make informed decisions and understand the roles of each member of their care team; and(e) Care delivery has evolved to be more team-based with a focus on patient centered care. Patients need to understand the credentials and qualifications of the health care professionals on their care team.(2) The legislature intends to preserve trust, ensure transparency, and protect patients from unnecessary confusion about the qualifications of their health care professionals.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 18.130 RCW to read as follows:(1)(a) License holders who provide health care services except custodial services, must affirmatively communicate and display the license holder's credentials during all patient encounters by wearing an identification badge that is visible and includes the health care provider's name and health care credential, including the initials and title of any health care-related degree that the license holder may have obtained.(b) License holders working in nonpatient care settings and who do not have any direct patient care interactions are not subject to the identification badge requirements in (a) of this subsection.(2) Any advertisement for health care services that names a license holder must identify the type of health care credential held by that license holder, including the initials and title of any health care-related degree that the license holder may have obtained.(3) For the purposes of this section:(a) "Advertisement" means any communication or statement, whether printed, electronic, or oral, that names the license holder in relation to their practice, profession, or institution in which the individual is employed, volunteers, or otherwise provides health care services. The term includes business cards, letterhead, patient brochures, email, internet content, audio and video content, and any other communication or statement used in the course of business.(b) "Health care service" has the same meaning as in RCW 48.43.005.Sec. 3. RCW 18.130.180 and 2025 c 389 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:Except as provided in RCW 18.130.450, the following conduct, acts, or conditions constitute unprofessional conduct for any license holder under the jurisdiction of this chapter:(1) The commission of any act involving moral turpitude, dishonesty, or corruption relating to the practice of the person's profession, whether the act constitutes a crime or not. If the act constitutes a crime, conviction in a criminal proceeding is not a condition precedent to disciplinary action. Upon such a conviction, however, the judgment and sentence is conclusive evidence at the ensuing disciplinary hearing of the guilt of the license holder of the crime described in the indictment or information, and of the person's violation of the statute on which it is based. For the purposes of this section, conviction includes all instances in which a plea of guilty or nolo contendere is the basis for the conviction and all proceedings in which the sentence has been deferred or suspended. Nothing in this section abrogates rights guaranteed under chapter 9.96A RCW;(2) Misrepresentation or concealment of a material fact in obtaining a license or in reinstatement thereof;(3) All advertising which is false, fraudulent, or misleading;(4) Incompetence, negligence, or malpractice which results in injury to a patient or which creates an unreasonable risk that a patient may be harmed. The use of a nontraditional treatment by itself shall not constitute unprofessional conduct, provided that it does not result in injury to a patient or create an unreasonable risk that a patient may be harmed;(5) Suspension, revocation, or restriction of the individual's license to practice any health care profession by competent authority in any state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction, a certified copy of the order, stipulation, or agreement being conclusive evidence of the revocation, suspension, or restriction;(6) The possession, use, prescription for use, or distribution of controlled substances or legend drugs in any way other than for legitimate or therapeutic purposes, diversion of controlled substances or legend drugs, the violation of any drug law, or prescribing controlled substances for oneself;(7) Violation of any state or federal statute or administrative rule regulating the profession in question, including any statute or rule defining or establishing standards of patient care or professional conduct or practice;(8) Failure to cooperate with the disciplining authority by:(a) Not furnishing any papers, documents, records, or other items;(b) Not furnishing in writing a full and complete explanation covering the matter contained in the complaint filed with the disciplining authority;(c) Not responding to subpoenas issued by the disciplining authority, whether or not the recipient of the subpoena is the accused in the proceeding; or(d) Not providing reasonable and timely access for authorized representatives of the disciplining authority seeking to perform practice reviews at facilities utilized by the license holder;(9) Failure to comply with an order issued by the disciplining authority or a stipulation for informal disposition entered into with the disciplining authority;(10) Aiding or abetting an unlicensed person to practice when a license is required;(11) Violations of rules established by any health agency;(12) Practice beyond the scope of practice as defined by law or rule;(13) Misrepresentation or fraud in any aspect of the conduct of the business or profession;(14) Failure to adequately supervise auxiliary staff to the extent that the consumer's health or safety is at risk;(15) Engaging in a profession involving contact with the public while suffering from a contagious or infectious disease involving serious risk to public health;(16) Promotion for personal gain of any unnecessary or inefficacious drug, device, treatment, procedure, or service;(17) Conviction of any gross misdemeanor or felony relating to the practice of the person's profession. For the purposes of this subsection, conviction includes all instances in which a plea of guilty or nolo contendere is the basis for conviction and all proceedings in which the sentence has been deferred or suspended. Nothing in this section abrogates rights guaranteed under chapter 9.96A RCW;(18) The offering, undertaking, or agreeing to cure or treat disease by a secret method, procedure, treatment, or medicine, or the treating, operating, or prescribing for any health condition by a method, means, or procedure which the licensee refuses to divulge upon demand of the disciplining authority;(19) The willful betrayal of a practitioner-patient privilege as recognized by law;(20) Violation of chapter 19.68 RCW or a pattern of violations of RCW 41.05.700(8), 48.43.735(8), 48.49.020, 48.49.030, 71.24.335(8), or 74.09.325(8);(21) Interference with an investigation or disciplinary proceeding by willful misrepresentation of facts before the disciplining authority or its authorized representative, or by the use of threats or harassment against any patient or witness to prevent them from providing evidence in a disciplinary proceeding or any other legal action, or by the use of financial inducements to any patient or witness to prevent or attempt to prevent him or her from providing evidence in a disciplinary proceeding;(22) Current misuse of:(a) Alcohol;(b) Controlled substances; or(c) Legend drugs;(23) Abuse of a client or patient or sexual contact with a client or patient;(24) Acceptance of more than a nominal gratuity, hospitality, or subsidy offered by a representative or vendor of medical or health-related products or services intended for patients, in contemplation of a sale or for use in research publishable in professional journals, where a conflict of interest is presented, as defined by rules of the disciplining authority, in consultation with the department, based on recognized professional ethical standards;(25) Violation of RCW 18.130.420;(26) Performing conversion therapy on a patient under age eighteen;(27) Violation of RCW 18.130.430;(28) Violation of RCW 18.130.460;(29) Violation of RCW 48.43.732; ((or))(30) Implanting the license holder's own gametes or reproductive material into a patient; or(31) Violation of section 2 of this act.Sec. 4. RCW 18.57.031 and 1987 c 150 s 42 are each amended to read as follows:(1) No person may practice or represent himself or herself as an osteopathic physician and surgeon without first having a valid license to do so.(2) A person may only represent himself or herself as an osteopathic physician surgeon if the person:(a) Is licensed under this chapter;(b) Has completed a surgical residency or fellowship approved by the accreditation council for graduate medical education or the royal college of physicians and surgeons of Canada;(c) Is certified, recertified, or eligible for examination by a surgical board of the American board of medical specialties or the royal college of physicians and surgeons of Canada; and(d) Maintains continuing education and proficiency in their specialty.(3) A violation of this section may be considered practice by an unlicensed person under RCW 18.130.190.Sec. 5. RCW 18.71.021 and 1987 c 150 s 46 are each amended to read as follows:(1) No person may practice or represent himself or herself as practicing medicine without first having a valid license to do so.(2) A person may only represent himself or herself as a physician surgeon if the person:(a) Is licensed under this chapter;(b) Has completed a surgical residency or fellowship approved by the accreditation council for graduate medical education or the royal college of physicians and surgeons of Canada;(c) Is certified, recertified, or eligible for examination by a surgical board of the American board of medical specialties or the royal college of physicians and surgeons of Canada; and(d) Maintains continuing education and proficiency in their specialty.(3) A violation of this section may be considered practice by an unlicensed person under RCW 18.130.190.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 70.41 RCW to read as follows:Each hospital must issue updated identification badges as necessary to meet the requirements of section 2 of this act at the earlier of:(1) The time that a new employee who is subject to section 2(1)(a) of this act is hired to provide health care services;(2) The time an employee who is subject to section 2(1)(a) of this act requires a new photograph for an identification badge;(3) The time that an employee who is subject to section 2(1)(a) of this act requires a new identification badge because the employee's name has changed;(4) The time that an employee who is subject to section 2(1)(a) of this act receives a new health care credential or health care-related degree;(5) The time that an employee who is subject to section 2(1)(a) of this act begins a new credentialing period; or(6) January 1, 2030.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7. A new section is added to chapter 18.20 RCW to read as follows:Each assisted living facility must issue updated identification badges as necessary to meet the requirements of section 2 of this act at the earlier of:(1) The time that a new employee who is subject to section 2(1)(a) of this act is hired to provide health care services;(2) The time an employee who is subject to section 2(1)(a) of this act requires a new photograph for an identification badge;(3) The time that an employee who is subject to section 2(1)(a) of this act requires a new identification badge because the employee's name has changed;(4) The time that an employee who is subject to section 2(1)(a) of this act receives a new health care credential or health care-related degree;(5) The time that an employee who is subject to section 2(1)(a) of this act begins a new credentialing period; or(6) January 1, 2030.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8. A new section is added to chapter 18.51 RCW to read as follows:Each nursing home must issue updated identification badges as necessary to meet the requirements of section 2 of this act at the earlier of:(1) The time that a new employee who is subject to section 2(1)(a) of this act is hired to provide health care services;(2) The time an employee who is subject to section 2(1)(a) of this act requires a new photograph for an identification badge;(3) The time that an employee who is subject to section 2(1)(a) of this act requires a new identification badge because the employee's name has changed;(4) The time that an employee who is subject to section 2(1)(a) of this act receives a new health care credential or health care-related degree;(5) The time that an employee who is subject to section 2(1)(a) of this act begins a new credentialing period; or(6) January 1, 2030.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 9. A new section is added to chapter 70.128 RCW to read as follows:Each adult family home must issue updated identification badges as necessary to meet the requirements of section 2 of this act at the earlier of:(1) The time that a new employee who is subject to section 2(1)(a) of this act is hired to provide health care services;(2) The time an employee who is subject to section 2(1)(a) of this act requires a new photograph for an identification badge;(3) The time that an employee who is subject to section 2(1)(a) of this act requires a new identification badge because the employee's name has changed;(4) The time that an employee who is subject to section 2(1)(a) of this act receives a new health care credential or health care-related degree;(5) The time that an employee who is subject to section 2(1)(a) of this act begins a new credentialing period; or(6) January 1, 2030.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 10. A new section is added to chapter 70.230 RCW to read as follows:Each ambulatory surgical facility must issue updated identification badges as necessary to meet the requirements of section 2 of this act at the earlier of:(1) The time that a new employee who is subject to section 2(1)(a) of this act is hired to provide health care services;(2) The time an employee who is subject to section 2(1)(a) of this act requires a new photograph for an identification badge;(3) The time that an employee who is subject to section 2(1)(a) of this act requires a new identification badge because the employee's name has changed;(4) The time that an employee who is subject to section 2(1)(a) of this act receives a new health care credential or health care-related degree;(5) The time that an employee who is subject to section 2(1)(a) of this act begins a new credentialing period; or(6) January 1, 2030.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 11. A new section is added to chapter 18.130 RCW to read as follows:No health profession board or commission may deviate from the requirements of this act.--- END ---